src/numeral-sma-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ############################## !
!This file contains the numerals !
! ############################## !




! Numerals
! ========

! The initial lexica
! ------------------

LEXICON Numeral
 MILLIJOVNE ;       ! a noun of its own
 OVERTÅVSENE ;       ! for generator over 1000
 JUSTTÅVSENE ;       ! going via 1000
 UNDERTÅVSENE ;      ! for generator under 1000
 OLD ;              ! for "thirteen hundred, etc.	
!num-imprecise ;                              
COLLECTIVE ;                            
 +Use/Circ: ARABIC ;           ! for the arabic numerals !
 +Use/Circ: ROMAN ;            ! for the roman numerals!
 +Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES ;     ! for §34 etc.!
 +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP ;  ! for ½ etc.!
 NUMBERLIKE ;      ! a dustbin







! We now run through the alphabetic numerals, ending up with the case
! inflection of the final number.

! Million, a noun of its own
! --------------------------

LEXICON MILLIJOVNE
millijovne:millijovn NUMTAGe ;
millijovnede+A+Ord:millijovned ORDTAGODD ;
 millijarde:millijard NUMTAGe ;! Num or N?
millijardede+A+Ord:millijarded ORDTAGODD ;

nulle:null NUMTAGe ;


! OVERTÅVSENE, for the numerals over 1000
! --------------------------------------

LEXICON OVERTÅVSENE
 O-AKTEF ;      ! 1000
 O-2TO9F ;      ! 2000, 3000, ...
 O-JUSTLUHKIEF ; ! 10000
 O-2TO9LUHKIE ;    ! 20000, 30000, ...
 O-TJUETIE ;    ! 100000
 O-2TO9TJUETIE ;   ! 200000, 300000, ...

! All the child lexica of OVERTUVSÁN have the prefix O-.
! They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTTÅVSENE.


! Thousands

LEXICON O-AKTEF
akte# JUSTTOVSENE ;
JUSTTOVSENE ;

LEXICON O-X1000
akte# JUSTTÅVSENE ;

LEXICON O-2TO9F                               
göökte#  JUSTTÅVSENE ;       
golme#  JUSTTÅVSENE ;  
njieljie# JUSTTÅVSENE ;   
 njielje# JUSTTÅVSENE ; !Saemesth amma
nieljie# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
nielje# JUSTTÅVSENE ; 
vïjhte#  JUSTTÅVSENE ;       
govhte#  JUSTTÅVSENE ;             
tjïjhtje#  JUSTTÅVSENE ;
gaektsie#  JUSTTÅVSENE ;         
uktsie#   JUSTTÅVSENE ;            

! Tens of thousands

LEXICON O-JUSTLUHKIEF
luhkie# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
luhkie#akte# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
luhkie# O-2TO9F ;
! This lexicon is for the number 10000 only. it is separated from the
! rest to avoid forms like *luhkieluhkietåvsene, etc.


LEXICON O-LUHKIEF     
luhkie# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
luhkie# O-X1000 ;
luhkie# O-2TO9F ;
! this lexicon is accessed only via other O-lexica, and not directly 
! from OVERTUVSÁN. Thus, *luhkieluhkietåvsene, etc. is avoided.

LEXICON O-LUHKIE123456789
luhkie#akte# JUSTTÅVSENE ;
luhkie# O-2TO9F ;

LEXICON O-2TO9LUHKIE  
göökte# O-LUHKIEF ;
golme# O-LUHKIEF ;
njieljie# O-LUHKIEF ;
njielje# O-LUHKIEF ;
nieljie# O-LUHKIEF ;
nielje# O-LUHKIEF ; 
vïjhte# O-LUHKIEF ;
govhte# O-LUHKIEF ;
tjïjhtje# O-LUHKIEF ;
gaektsie# O-LUHKIEF ;
uktsie# O-LUHKIEF ;




! Hundreds of thousands

LEXICON O-TJUETIE
 tjuetie# JUSTTÅVSENE ; ! 100000
 tjuetie# O-X1000 ;    ! 101000
 tjuetie# O-2TO9F ;    ! 102000, 103000, ...
 tjuetie# O-LUHKIEF ;   ! 110000, 113000, ...
 tjuetie# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !100011, 100012, ...
 tjuetie# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
 nïmme# JUSTTÅVSENE ; ! 100000
 nïmme# O-X1000 ;    ! 101000
 nïmme# O-2TO9F ;    ! 102000, 103000, ...
 nïmme# O-LUHKIEF ;   ! 110000, 113000, ...
 nïmme# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !100011, 100012, ...
 nïmme# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
 nymme# JUSTTÅVSENE ; ! 100000
 nymme# O-X1000 ;    ! 101000
 nymme# O-2TO9F ;    ! 102000, 103000, ...
 nymme# O-LUHKIEF ;   ! 110000, 113000, ...
 nymme# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !100011, 100012, ...
 nymme# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
 nomme# JUSTTÅVSENE ; ! 100000
 nomme# O-X1000 ;    ! 101000
 nomme# O-2TO9F ;    ! 102000, 103000, ...
 nomme# O-LUHKIEF ;   ! 110000, 113000, ...
 nomme# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !100011, 100012, ...
 nomme# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
 stoere#luhkie# JUSTTÅVSENE ; ! 100000
 stoere#luhkie# O-X1000 ;    ! 101000
 stoere#luhkie# O-2TO9F ;    ! 102000, 103000, ...
 stoere#luhkie# O-LUHKIEF ;   ! 110000, 113000, ...
 stoere#luhkie# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !100011, 100012, ...
 stoere#luhkie# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
 stoerre#luhkie# JUSTTÅVSENE ; ! 100000
 stoerre#luhkie# O-X1000 ;    ! 101000
 stoerre#luhkie# O-2TO9F ;    ! 102000, 103000, ...
 stoerre#luhkie# O-LUHKIEF ;   ! 110000, 113000, ...
 stoerre#luhkie# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !100011, 100012, ...
 stoerre#luhkie# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...


LEXICON O-TJUETIE2
 tjuetie# JUSTTÅVSENE ;  ! 200000
 tjuetie# O-X1000 ;     ! 201000
 tjuetie# O-2TO9F ;     ! 202000, 203000, ...
 tjuetie# O-LUHKIEF ;    ! 210000, 213000, ...
 tjuetie# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !200011, 200012, ...
 tjuetie# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;   ! 220000, 223000, ...
 nïmme# JUSTTÅVSENE ;  ! 200000
 nïmme# O-X1000 ;     ! 201000
 nïmme# O-2TO9F ;     ! 202000, 203000, ...
 nïmme# O-LUHKIEF ;    ! 210000, 213000, ...
 nïmme# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !200011, 200012, ...
 nïmme# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;   ! 220000, 223000, ...
 nymme# JUSTTÅVSENE ;  ! 200000
 nymme# O-X1000 ;     ! 201000
 nymme# O-2TO9F ;     ! 202000, 203000, ...
 nymme# O-LUHKIEF ;    ! 210000, 213000, ...
 nymme# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !200011, 200012, ...
 nymme# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;   ! 220000, 223000, ...
 nomme# JUSTTÅVSENE ;  ! 200000
 nomme# O-X1000 ;     ! 201000
 nomme# O-2TO9F ;     ! 202000, 203000, ...
 nomme# O-LUHKIEF ;    ! 210000, 213000, ...
 nomme# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !200011, 200012, ...
 nomme# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;   ! 220000, 223000, ...
 stoere#luhkie# JUSTTÅVSENE ;  ! 200000
 stoere#luhkie# O-X1000 ;     ! 201000
 stoere#luhkie# O-2TO9F ;     ! 202000, 203000, ...
 stoere#luhkie# O-LUHKIEF ;    ! 210000, 213000, ...
 stoere#luhkie# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !200011, 200012, ...
 stoere#luhkie# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;   ! 220000, 223000, ...
 stoerre#luhkie# JUSTTÅVSENE ;  ! 200000
 stoerre#luhkie# O-X1000 ;     ! 201000
 stoerre#luhkie# O-2TO9F ;     ! 202000, 203000, ...
 stoerre#luhkie# O-LUHKIEF ;    ! 210000, 213000, ...
 stoerre#luhkie# O-LUHKIE123456789 ;  !200011, 200012, ...
 stoerre#luhkie# O-2TO9LUHKIE ;   ! 220000, 223000, ...


LEXICON O-2TO9TJUETIE
 akte# O-TJUETIE ;       ! #one# hundred...
göökte# O-TJUETIE2 ;
golme# O-TJUETIE2 ;
njieljie# O-TJUETIE2 ;
njielje# O-TJUETIE2 ;
nieljie# O-TJUETIE2 ;
nielje# O-TJUETIE2 ; 
vïjhte# O-TJUETIE2 ;
govhte# O-TJUETIE2 ;
tjïjhtje# O-TJUETIE2 ;
gaektsie# O-TJUETIE2 ;
uktsie# O-TJUETIE2 ;


LEXICON JUSTTOVSENE
tåvsene# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 tåvsene+Num:tåvsan ORDTAGODD ;                    ! Case infl of tåvsene
tåvsanede+A+Ord:tåvsaned ORDTAGEVEN ;
tovsene# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 tovsene+Num:tovsen ORDTAGODD ;                    ! Case infl of tovsene
tovsenede+A+Ord:tovsened ORDTAGEVEN ;
stoere#tjuetie# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
stoere#tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoere#tjuetie FINAL1 ;
 stoere#tjuetie:stoere#tjuet NUMTAGie ;        ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoerre#tjuetie# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
stoerre#tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoerre#tjuetie FINAL1 ;
 stoerre#tjuetie:stoerre#tjuet NUMTAGie ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoerre#nïmme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoerre#nïmme:stoerre#nïmm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoerre#nymme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoerre#nymme:stoerre#nymm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoerre#nomme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoerre#nomme:stoerre#nomm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoere#nïmme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoere#nïmme:stoere#nïmm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoere#nymme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoere#nymme:stoere#nymm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoere#nomme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoere#nomme:stoere#nomm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene

! Justtåvsene, for numerals going via 1000
! -------------------------------------

LEXICON JUSTTÅVSENE
 tåvsene# UNDERTÅVSENE ;             ! Thousand-and-something
 tåvsene+Num:tåvsan ORDTAGODD ;                   ! Case infl of tåvsene
tåvsanede+A+Ord:tåvsaned ORDTAGEVEN ;
 tovsene# UNDERTÅVSENE ;             ! Thousand-and-something
 tovsene+Num:tovsen ORDTAGODD ;                   ! Case infl of tovsene
tovsenede+A+Ord:tovsened ORDTAGEVEN ;
stoere#tjuetie# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
stoere#tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoere#tjuetie FINAL1 ;
 stoere#tjuetie:stoere#tjuet NUMTAGie ;        ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoerre#tjuetie# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
stoerre#tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoerre#tjuetie FINAL1 ;
 stoerre#tjuetie:stoerre#tjuet NUMTAGie ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoerre#nïmme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoerre#nïmme:stoerre#nïmm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoerre#nymme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoerre#nymme:stoerre#nymm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoerre#nomme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoerre#nomme:stoerre#nomm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoere#nïmme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoere#nïmme:stoere#nïmm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoere#nymme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoere#nymme:stoere#nymm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene
stoere#nomme# UNDERTÅVSENE ;
 stoere#nomme:stoere#nomm NUMTAGe ;      ! Case infl of tåvsene


! Old, for the old counting thirteen hundred etc.	
! -----------------------------------------------

LEXICON OLD					
luhkie#akte GTJUETIE ;						
luhkie#göökte GTJUETIE ;					
luhkie#golme GTJUETIE ;	
luhkie#njieljie GTJUETIE ;									
luhkie#njielje GTJUETIE ;					
luhkie#nieljie GTJUETIE ;			
luhkie#nielje GTJUETIE ;		
luhkie#vïjhte GTJUETIE ;					
luhkie#govhte GTJUETIE ;					
luhkie#tjïjhtje GTJUETIE ;	
luhkie#gaektsie GTJUETIE ;					
luhkie#uktsie GTJUETIE ;									






LEXICON UNDERTÅVSENE
 AKTEF ;     ! 1
 2TO9F ;     ! 2-9
 LUHKIEF ;     ! 10
!LÅGENAN ;   ! 11-19             
 2TO9LUHKIE ;   ! 20-99
 TJUETIE ;     ! 100-199
 2TO9TJUETIE ;   ! 200-999

LEXICON AKTEF
akte:akt NUMTAGe ;        
 voestes+A+Ord+Sg+Nom:voestes         FINAL1 ; !XXX check this


LEXICON 2TO9F
göökte:guekt NUMTAGie ;
göökte:göökt NUMTAGe ;
golme:golm NUMTAGe ;
njieljie+Num+Sg+Nom:njieljie FINAL1 ;
njieljie:njielj NUMTAGie ;
 njielje:njielj NUMTAGe ; !Saemesth amma
nieljie+Num+Sg+Nom:nieljie FINAL1 ;
nieljie:nielj NUMTAGie ;
nielje:nielj NUMTAGe ; 
vïjhte:vïjht NUMTAGe ;
govhte:govht NUMTAGe ;
tjïjhtje:tjïjhtj NUMTAGe ;
gaektsie+Num+Sg+Nom:gaektsie FINAL1 ;
gaektsie:gaekts NUMTAGie ;
uktsie+Num+Sg+Nom:uktsie FINAL1 ;
uktsie:ukts NUMTAGie ;
mubpie+A+Ord:mubp           MUBPIE ;
nubpie+A+Ord:nubp           MUBPIE ;
gåalmede+A+Ord:gåalmad ORDTAGODD ;
njieljede+A+Ord:njieljied ORDTAGODD ;
njealjede+A+Ord:njealjad ORDTAGODD ;
nealjede+A+Ord:nealjad ORDTAGODD ;
nieljede+A+Ord:nieljied ORDTAGODD ;
vïjhtede+A+Ord:vïjhted ORDTAGODD ;
govhtede+A+Ord:govhted ORDTAGODD ;
tjïjhtjede+A+Ord:tjïjhtjed ORDTAGODD ;
gaaktsede+A+Ord:gaaktsad ORDTAGODD ;
åktsede+A+Ord:åktsad ORDTAGODD ;
gööktesh:gööktes COLLTAG ;
golmesh:golmes COLLTAG ;
njealjesh:njealjas COLLTAG ;
vïjhtesh:vïjhtes COLLTAG ;
govhtesh:govhtes COLLTAG ;
tjïjhtjesh:tjïjhtjes COLLTAG ;
gaaktsesh:gaaktsas COLLTAG ;
åktsesh:åktsas COLLTAG ;

! Case forms of the basic digits
! ------------------------------
